Hawaii statutes.
[§141-12]
Agricultural food safety certification program. (a) There is
established within the department of agriculture an agricultural food safety
certification program. The program shall:

(1) Develop and implement a certification system that
shall at a minimum comply with the requirements of the FDA Food Safety
Modernization Act;

(2) Support the agricultural industry and assist
farmers and ranchers subject to the requirements of the FDA Food Safety
Modernization Act by developing and implementing a food safety certification
program that will concurrently satisfy the requirements of the department of
agriculture and the FDA Food Safety Modernization Act;

(3) Conduct research into alternative, less
burdensome methods by which Hawaii's farmers and ranchers can satisfy the
requirements of the FDA Food Safety Modernization Act;

(4) Establish an education program, including online
classes, that addresses compliance with state and federal food safety
requirements for farmers and ranchers;

(5) Serve as an information clearinghouse for all
matters related to the FDA Food Safety Modernization Act and any other food
safety laws; and

(6) Undertake activities to improve and sustain the
safety of agricultural foods and other functions as may be assigned by law.

(b) The chairperson of the board of
agriculture may employ:

(1) One program manager and one specialist, who are
qualified to apply the provisions and requirements of the FDA Food Safety
Modernization Act to the program; and

(2) One clerical staff person.

(c) For purposes of this section,
"agricultural food" includes food that is applicable to farmers and
ranchers under the FDA Food Safety Modernization Act. [L 2016, c 106, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next